Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1110.01
Accounting division; purpose.

The purpose of the accounting division is to prescribe, coordinate, and administer a centralized, uniform state accounting and payroll system and personnel information system, to establish and enforce accounting policies and procedures for all state agencies, boards, and commissions, to monitor and enforce state expenditure limitations established by approved state appropriations and budget allotments, and to administer the federal Social Security Act for the state and the state's political subdivisions.

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 36.